Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Article 1. Public Works Planning and Construction.

Sec. 35.10.010.
Standard plans and specifications and limitation on cost.

The department shall prepare and adopt plans and specifications and determine standards for the construction of each public work. Each public work shall be limited in cost to the amount of the appropriation made for that purpose. The plans and specifications may be amended from time to time as the department considers advisable. This section does not apply to the construction of school buildings.

History.

(§ 1 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 46 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Works and Contracts, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 35.10.015.
Accessibility of public buildings and facilities.

The department shall prepare, adopt, and enforce regulations governing the construction of public buildings and facilities by or for the state, including the University of Alaska, and its political subdivisions, whether financed in whole or in part by federal funds, to ensure that public buildings and facilities are accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities and by the aged or infirm. The regulations of the department must conform to a standard comparable to applicable provisions of federal law, regulations, and standards.

The department shall develop and maintain an inventory of all public buildings and facilities with respect to their compliance with the regulations adopted under (a) of this section. In addition, the department shall develop cost estimates and recommended priorities for the upgrading of public buildings and facilities that do not conform with the regulations adopted under (a) of this section.

All ferries owned or operated by the state shall be equipped with elevators or other passenger lifting equipment, ramps, or other facilities and devices to ensure that these vessels are accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities and by aged or infirm passengers. In this subsection, “accessible to and usable by” means that a person with a disability or an aged or infirm passenger can board, disembark, and move between decks and about the public areas aboard a state ferry with personal comfort and safety and with safety to other passengers and members of the crew.

After June 25, 1976, a ferry may not be constructed, lengthened, completely renovated, or purchased for use or entered into service by the division of marine transportation of the department as a part of the Alaska marine highway system that does not include adequate facilities and devices to ensure that the vessel is accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities and by aged or infirm passengers. Some staterooms and all restrooms, indoor passageways, outdoor weather decks, and other public areas aboard the vessel shall be so designed and constructed as to permit access and use by persons with disabilities and by aged or infirm passengers, including those persons occupying a wheelchair.

After June 25, 1976, a public building or facility in the state may not be planned, designed, financed, constructed, opened to public use, or otherwise placed in operation unless it meets the standards established under this section. If the standards for a public building or facility are not provided for in federal statute, regulation, or standards, the department shall determine the extent of, and adopt regulations setting the standards for, access to and use of the public building or facility by persons with disabilities and by the aged or infirm.

The department may establish by regulation and collect reasonable fees for services provided in the course of determining compliance with regulations adopted under this section.

In this section, “public facilities” includes vessels owned by the state and operated by the division of marine transportation of the department as a part of the Alaska marine highway system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 119 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1972; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 249 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 23 SLA 1987; am § 48 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 54 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 11 ch 6 SLA 1998; am §§ 14 — 17 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, the former first sentence of subsection (c) was relettered as subsection (g).

Administrative Code. —

For buildings, see 17 AAC 50.

Sec. 35.10.020.
Consultation with municipal planning commissions.
[Repealed, § 4 ch 143 SLA 1977. For current law, see AS 35.30.]

Sec. 35.10.025.
Compliance with local building codes.

A public building shall be built in accordance with applicable local building codes, including the obtaining of required permits. This section applies to all buildings of the state and corporate authorities of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1968)

Cross references. —

For other provisions relating to compliance with local ordinances and regulations, see AS 35.30.

Sec. 35.10.030.
Inspecting and supervising public works construction.

The department shall supervise and inspect the construction of public works and shall see that the work performed in constructing, repairing, altering, or improving public works is in accordance with the drawings and specifications for them, that the interests of the state are fully protected, and that no person, firm, or corporation employed on any work performs the work in any other or different manner than is provided by the contract and the plans and specifications.

History.

(§ 3 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.040.
Failure of contractor to perform work.

If a contractor or person in charge of the construction of a public building in the state fails to perform the work in a good and workmanlike manner and does not perform the work in accordance with the plans and specifications of the contract, the department shall direct what legal action, if any, shall be taken.

History.

(§ 4 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Works and Contracts, §§ 104, 105.

73A C.J.S., Public Contracts, § 40.

Sec. 35.10.050.
Duty of department to examine and report on existing public buildings.

The department shall, from time to time, examine all existing public buildings and report the condition of each and any necessary additional construction that is needed on them.

History.

(§ 4 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.060.
Inspection and testing of materials.

The department may inspect and test materials, supplies, equipment, and machinery used by a contractor constructing or maintaining public works, and may develop methods and procedures for inspection and testing.

History.

(§ 5 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.070.
Research on public works.

The department may gather, investigate, and compile information concerning the use, construction, and maintenance of public works, the practices and methods of efficient organization, financing and such other information, data and statistics of the state, and the extent of natural resources of building materials in the state.
The department shall disseminate this information, together with recommendations it considers advisable.

History.

(§ 6 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.080.
Statement of work authorized, completion schedule, and recommendations.

Not later than February 1 of each year, the department shall prepare a statement showing the public works authorized within the past six-year period and the completion schedule as of that date, together with recommendations regarding the need for additional public works construction, if any.

History.

(§ 7 art III title III ch 152 SLA 1957)